Illinois, session 104th, HB4710.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $150,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity of 7Chicago for the purpose of covering costs associated with 8developing an impact report in conjunction with the Illinois 9Arts Council. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.